lt-LT: Gitaros tiltelio sistemos tipas: Akustinis tiltelis su kaiščiais; „Bigsby“ stiliaus vibrato; Klasikinis tiltelis su surišimu; „Floyd Rose“ stiliaus fiksuojamas tremolo; Fiksuotas tiltelis („Hardtail“); Tremolo (sinchronizuotas); „Tune-o-matic“; Apvyniojamas tiltelis („Wraparound“); Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta sustava mosta za gitaru: Akustični most s klinovima; Bigsby stil vibrata; Klasični most s vezivanjem; Floyd Rose stil tremola sa zaključavanjem; Hardtail (fiksni); Tremolo (sinkronizirani); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Ostalo
vi: Loại hệ thống cầu đàn guitar: Ngựa đàn acoustic có chốt; Bộ rung kiểu Bigsby; Ngựa buộc dây cổ điển; Tremolo khóa kiểu Floyd Rose; Hardtail (cố định); Tremolo (đồng bộ); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Khác
tr: Gitar köprü sistemi tipi: Akustik pinli köprü; Bigsby stili vibrato; Klasik düğümlü köprü; Floyd Rose stili kilitli tremolo; Hardtail (sabit); Tremolo (senkronize); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Diğer
el: Τύπος συστήματος γέφυρας κιθάρας: Γέφυρα ακουστικής με πείρους; Βιμπράτο τύπου Bigsby; Γέφυρα κλασικής κιθάρας; Τρέμολο κλειδώματος τύπου Floyd Rose; Hardtail (σταθερή); Tremolo (συγχρονισμένο); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul sistemului de punte pentru chitară: Căluș acustic cu pini; Vibrato stil Bigsby; Căluș clasic cu bloc de legare; Tremolo cu blocare tip Floyd Rose; Hardtail (fix); Tremolo (sincronizat); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Altele
sv: Typ av gitarrbrygga: Akustiskt stall med stallstift; Vibrato i Bigsby-stil; Klassiskt stall med knytblock; Låsbart svajstall i Floyd Rose-stil; Hardtail (fast); Svajstall (synkroniserat); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de sistema de ponte para guitarra: Ponte acústica com pinos; Vibrato estilo Bigsby; Ponte clássica de atar; Tremolo de bloqueio estilo Floyd Rose; Hardtail (fixa); Tremolo (sincronizado); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Outro
pt-BR: Guitarra ponte sistema tipo: Ponte com pinos para acústico; Vibrato estilo Bigsby; Ponte clássica com bloco de amarração; Tremolo com trava estilo Floyd Rose; Hardtail (fixa); Tremolo (sincronizado); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Outro
fi: Kitaran tallajärjestelmän tyyppi: Akustisen kitaran tappitalla; Bigsby-tyylinen vibrato; Klassinen solmutalla; Floyd Rose -tyyppinen lukkiutuva tremolo; Hardtail (kiinteä); Tremolo (synkronoitu); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Muu
th: ประเภทของระบบสะพานสายของกีตาร์: บริดจ์กีตาร์โปร่งแบบมีพิน; วิบราโตสไตล์ Bigsby; บริดจ์กีตาร์คลาสสิกแบบมัดสาย; เทรโมโลแบบล็อกสายสไตล์ Floyd Rose; ฮาร์ดเทล (ยึดติดกับที่); เทรโมโล (ซิงโครไนซ์); Tune-o-matic; แรปอะราวด์; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 吉他琴橋系統類型: 木吉他弦栓琴橋; Bigsby 樣式顫音; 古典吉他綁弦琴橋; Floyd Rose 樣式鎖定顫音; 硬尾 (固定); 搖座 (同步); Tune-o-matic 琴橋; 包覆式琴橋; 其他
en: Guitar bridge system type: Acoustic pin bridge; Bigsby-style vibrato; Classical tie-block bridge; Floyd Rose-style locking tremolo; Hardtail (fixed); Tremolo (synchronized); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Other
nb: Gitarbrosystemtype: Akustisk bro med pinner; Bigsby-stil vibrato; Klassisk knutebro; Floyd Rose-stil låsbar tremolo; Hardtail (fast); Tremolo (synkronisert); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Annet
it: Tipo di sistema di ponte per chitarra: Ponte con piroli; Vibrato stile Bigsby; Ponte classico con blocco di legatura; Tremolo bloccante stile Floyd Rose; Hardtail (fisso); Tremolo (sincronizzato); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Altro
ja: ギターブリッジシステムタイプ: アコースティックピンブリッジ; ビグスビースタイルのビブラート; クラシックタイブロックブリッジ; フロイドローズスタイルのロッキングトレモロ; ハードテイル (固定); トレモロ (シンクロナイズド); チューン・オー・マチック; ラップアラウンド; その他
fr: Type de système de chevalet de guitare: Chevalet de guitare acoustique à chevilles; Vibrato de style Bigsby; Chevalet classique à bloc d’attache; Vibrato à blocage de style Floyd Rose; Hardtail (fixe); Tremolo (synchronisé); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Autre
pl: Typ systemu mostka gitary: Mostek akustyczny z kołkami; Vibrato w stylu Bigsby; Klasyczny mostek strunociągu (Tie-block); Blokowane tremolo w stylu Floyd Rose; Hardtail (stały); Tremolo (zsynchronizowane); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Inne
cs: Typ kobylkového systému kytary: Akustická kobylka s kolíčky; Vibrato ve stylu Bigsby; Klasická kobylka s uvazováním; Zamykací tremolo ve stylu Floyd Rose; Hardtail (pevná); Tremolo (synchronizované); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Ostatní
ru: Тип бридж-системы гитары: Акустический бридж с пинами; Вибрато в стиле Bigsby; Классический бридж (tie-block); Тремоло с фиксацией в стиле Floyd Rose; Хардтейл (фиксированный); Тремоло (синхронизированное); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta sistema kobilice kitare: Akustični mostiček z zatiči; Vibrato v slogu Bigsby; Klasični mostiček z vezavo; Tremolo z zaklepanjem v slogu Floyd Rose; Hardtail (fiksen); Tremolo (sinhroniziran); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Drugo
nl: Gitaar brug systeemtype: Brug met akoestische pinnen; Bigsby-stijl vibrato; Klassieke knoopblokbrug; Floyd Rose-stijl locking-tremolo; Hardtail (vast); Tremolo (gesynchroniseerd); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Overig
es: Tipo de sistema de puente de la guitarra: Puente acústico con pasadores; Vibrato estilo Bigsby; Puente clásico para anudar; Trémolo con bloqueo estilo Floyd Rose; Hardtail (fijo); Trémolo (sincronizado); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Otro
bg-BG: Тип система на моста на китарата: Акустичен мост с пинове; Вибрато тип Bigsby; Класически мост тип tie-block; Заключващо тремоло тип Floyd Rose; Hardtail (фиксиран); Тремоло (синхронизирано); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Други
de: Typ des Gitarrenbrückensystems: Akustik-Pin-Brücke; Bigsby-Style Vibrato; Klassische Tie-Block-Brücke; Locking-Tremolo im Floyd-Rose-Stil; Hardtail (fixiert); Tremolo (synchronisiert); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Sonstige
ko: 기타 브리지 시스템 유형: 어쿠스틱 핀 브릿지; 빅스비 스타일 비브라토; 클래식 타이 블록 브릿지; 플로이드 로즈 스타일 락킹 트레몰로; 하드테일(고정형); 트레몰로(동기화형); 튠오매틱; 랩어라운드; 기타
da: Type af bro-system på guitar: Akustisk bro med pinde; Vibrato i Bigsby-stil; Klassisk tie-block-bro; Låsbar tremolo i Floyd Rose-stil; Hardtail (fast); Tremolo (synkroniseret); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Andet
hu: Gitárhíd rendszer típusa: Akusztikus húrlábas tüskés híd; Bigsby-stílusú vibrato; Klasszikus kötözős híd; Floyd Rose-stílusú satus tremolo; Hardtail (fix); Tremolo (szinkronizált); Tune-o-matic; Körültekerős (wraparound); Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ systému gitarovej kobylky: Akustická kobylka s kolíkmi; Vibrato v štýle Bigsby; Klasická kobylka so strunníkom; Zamykacie tremolo v štýle Floyd Rose; Hardtail (pevná); Tremolo (synchronizované); Tune-o-matic; Wraparound; Iné
zh-CN: 吉他琴桥系统类型: 原声固弦锥琴桥; Bigsby 风格颤音; 古典系弦系块琴桥; Floyd Rose 风格锁定颤音; 硬尾（固定）; 颤音（同步）; Tune-o-matic; 环绕式; 其他